Utah statutes.
78B-1-123.   Jurors and witnesses -- Limit of time for presentation of
certificate.
Any holder of a witness's or juror's certificate specified in this title shall
be required to present it to the county treasurer or to the county auditor, as
the case may be, of the county where the certificate was issued within one
year from the date of its issuance. If the same is not presented for payment
within that time, it is invalid and will not be paid.
